Maryland, session 2025, SB0411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–861.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “POSTPARTUM DEPRESSION SCREENING” MEANS THE
ADMINISTRATION, REVIEW, OR DISCUSSION OF THE EDINBURG POSTNATAL
DEPRESSION SCALE OR ANY SIMILAR METHOD USED TO SCREEN FOR POSTPARTUM
DEPRESSION.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0411*

SENATE BILL 411
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR POSTPARTUM DEPRESSION SCREENING.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
COVERAGE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE SUBJECT TO A COPAYMENT
OR COINSURANCE REQUIREMENT OR DEDUCTIBLE THAT AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO
THIS SECTION IMPOSES FOR SIMILAR COVERAGES UNDER THE SAME POLICY OR
CONTRACT.
(II) THE COPAYMENT OR COINSURANCE REQUIREMENT OR
DEDUCTIBLE IMPOSED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT BE
GREATER THAN THE COPAYMENT OR COINSURANCE REQUIREMENT OR DEDUCTIBLE
IMPOSED BY THE ENTITY FOR SIMILAR COVERAGES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.